Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116P.08, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Legislative recommendations. (a) Funding may be provided only for those projects that meet the categories established in subdivision 1. (b) The commission must recommend an annual or biennial legislative bill to make appropriations from the trust fund for the purposes provided in subdivision 1. The recommendations must be submitted to the governor for inclusion in the biennial budget and supplemental budget submitted to the legislature. (c) The commission may recommend regional block grants for a portion of trust fund expenditures to partner with existing regional organizations that have strong citizen involvement, to address unique local needs and capacity, and to leverage all available funding sources for projects. (d) The commission may recommend the establishment of an emerging issues account in its legislative bill for funding emerging issues, which come up unexpectedly, but which still adhere to the commission's strategic plandeleted text begin , to bedeleted text end new text begin . Expenditures from the emerging issues account must benew text end approved by the governornew text begin and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources financenew text end after initiation and recommendation by the commission.new text begin Recommendations by the commission for an expenditure from the emerging issues account require an affirmative vote of at least 15 members of the commission.new text end (e) Money in the trust fund may not be spent except under an appropriation by law.